apertium-fra.fra.metadix
<pardef n="g/ésir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>errions</l>   <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>errais</l>    <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erriez</l>    <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>errais</l>    <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erraient</l>  <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>errait</l>    <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>errons</l>    <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>errai</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>errez</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erras</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erront</l>    <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erra</l>      <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eümes</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ui</l>        <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eüstes</l>    <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eüs</l>       <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urent</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ut</l>        <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isons</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isons</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isez</l>      <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isez</l>      <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussions</l>   <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usse</l>      <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussiez</l>    <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usses</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussent</l>    <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ût</l>        <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isant</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ésir</l>      <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isions</l>    <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isais</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isiez</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isais</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isaient</l>   <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isait</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isons</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isez</l>      <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isent</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ît</l>        <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isions</l>    <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ise</l>       <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isiez</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ises</l>      <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isent</l>     <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ise</l>       <r>ésir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="luî/mes__vblex">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>mes</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tes</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dî/mes__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>mes</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aboutî/mes__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>mes</l>       <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="abrèg/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="quérir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="gésir"><i>g</i><par n="g/ésir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="quérir"><i>quér</i><par n="quérir__vblex"/></e>
